Louisiana, session 2026, HB1162.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1892(A)(1) and (I)(2)(a) and (3) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 22:1892(I)(4) and (L) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1892. Payment and adjustment of claims; policies other than life and health and
accident; good faith duty; breach of good faith duty; vehicle damage claims;
extension of time to respond to claims during emergency or disaster;
penalties; arson-related claims suspension; definitions
A.(1) All insurers issuing any type of contract, other than those specified in
R.S. 22:1811, 1821, and Chapter 10 of Title 23 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, shall pay the amount of any claim due any insured within thirty days except
as provided in R.S. 22:1892.2, as applicable, after receipt of satisfactory proofs of
loss from the insured or any party in interest. The insurer shall notify the insurance
producer of record of all such payments for property damage claims made in
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1162 ENROLLED
accordance with this Paragraph. However, if a contractor is a named payee on a
check or draft intended for the repair or restoration of immovable property, the
insurer or its adjuster shall first verify the contractor's license status through the
website or portal of the Louisiana State Licensing Board for Contractors. The
amount of any claim due shall be paid pursuant to this Section or R.S. 22:1892.2, as
applicable, after receipt of satisfactory proof of loss and, if applicable, completion
of the verification required by this Paragraph.
* * *
I.(1)
* * *
(2) Any one of the following acts, if knowingly committed or performed by
an insurer or representative of the insurer, constitutes a breach of the insurer's duties
imposed in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection:
(a) A misrepresentation of pertinent facts or insurance policy provisions
relating to any coverages at issue or a misrepresentation of relevant insurance policy
provisions.
* * *
(3) The provisions of this Subsection shall not create a cause of action
against an insurer by the insured or his assignee in a claim for personal injury or
bodily injury when any of the following conditions are present:
(a) There is a good faith dispute as to liability.
(b) There is a good faith dispute as to medical causation for the injuries
alleged by the claimant.
(c) An offer has not been presented by or on behalf of a third-party claimant
within the applicable policy limits, and the insurer has been given at least thirty days
to respond.
(4) The provisions of this Subsection shall not create a separate cause of
action against a representative of the insurer distinct and apart from the cause of
action against the insurer.
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1162 ENROLLED
L.(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section or of R.S.
22:1892.2 to the contrary, an insurer shall not be deemed to have acted in bad faith,
nor shall that insurer be subject to any penalty or attorney fees, for a delay in
transmitting payment if that delay is directly and reasonably attributable to the
insurer's inability to verify a contractor's license through the portal or website of the
Louisiana State Licensing Board for Contractors.
(2) To qualify for the safe harbor provided in this Subsection, the insurer
shall do all of the following:
(a) Document the attempt to verify the license in the claim file, including the
date, time, and result of the search.
(b) Provide written notice to the insured within five business days of the
failed verification attempt, stating that payment is being withheld or delayed pending
verification of the contractor's license status as required by Paragraph (A)(1) of this
Section.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.